Utah statutes.
78B-12-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Adjusted gross income" means income calculated under Subsection
78B-12-204(1).
(2)  "Administrative agency" means the Office of Recovery Services or the
Department of Human Services.
(3)  "Administrative order" means an order that has been issued by the Office
of Recovery Services, the Department of Human Services, or an administrative
agency of another state or other comparable jurisdiction with similar
authority to that of the office.
(4)  "Base child support award" means the award that may be ordered and is
calculated using the guidelines before additions for medical expenses and
work-related child care costs.
(5)  "Base combined child support obligation table," "child support table,"
"base child support obligation table," "low income table," or "table" means
the appropriate table in Part 3, Tables.
(6)  "Cash medical support" means an obligation to equally share all
reasonable and necessary medical and dental expenses of children.
(7)  "Child" means:
(a)  a son or daughter under the age of 18 years who is not otherwise
emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the armed forces of the
United States;
(b)  a son or daughter over the age of 18 years, while enrolled in high school
during the normal and expected year of graduation and not otherwise
emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the armed forces of the
United States; or
(c)  a son or daughter of any age who is incapacitated from earning a living
and, if able to provide some financial resources to the family, is not able to
support self by own means.
(8)  "Child support" means a base child support award, or a monthly financial
award for uninsured medical expenses, ordered by a tribunal for the support of
a child, including current periodic payments, all arrearages which accrue
under an order for current periodic payments, and sum certain judgments
awarded for arrearages, medical expenses, and child care costs.
(9)  "Child support order" or "support order" means a judgment, decree, or
order of a tribunal whether interlocutory or final, whether or not
prospectively or retroactively modifiable, whether incidental to a proceeding
for divorce, judicial or legal separation, separate maintenance, paternity,
guardianship, civil protection, or otherwise which:
(a)  establishes or modifies child support;
(b)  reduces child support arrearages to judgment; or
(c)  establishes child support or registers a child support order under
Chapter 14, Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
(10)  "Child support services" or "IV-D child support services" means services
provided pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
Section 651 et seq.
(11)  "Court" means the district court or juvenile court.
(12)  "Guidelines" means the directions for the calculation and application of
child support in Part 2, Calculation and Adjustment.
(13)  "Income" means earnings, compensation, or other payment due to an
individual, regardless of source, whether denominated as wages, salary,
commission, bonus, pay, allowances, contract payment, or otherwise, including
severance pay, sick pay, and incentive pay.  "Income" includes:
(a)  all gain derived from capital assets, labor, or both, including profit
gained through sale or conversion of capital assets;
(b)  interest and dividends;
(c)  periodic payments made under pension or retirement programs or insurance
policies of any type;
(d)  unemployment compensation benefits;
(e)  workers' compensation benefits; and
(f)  disability benefits.
(14)  "Joint physical custody" means the child stays with each parent
overnight for more than 30% of the year, and both parents contribute to the
expenses of the child in addition to paying child support.
(15)  "Medical expenses" means health and dental expenses and related
insurance costs.
(16)  "Obligee" means an individual, this state, another state, or another
comparable jurisdiction to whom child support is owed or who is entitled to
reimbursement of child support or public assistance.
(17)  "Obligor" means any person owing a duty of support.
(18)  "Office" means the Office of Recovery Services within the Department of
Human Services.
(19)  "Parent" includes a natural parent, or an adoptive parent.
(20)  "Split custody" means that each parent has physical custody of at least
one of the children.
(21)  "State" includes any state, territory, possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Native American
Tribe, or other comparable domestic or foreign jurisdiction.
(22)  "Temporary" means a period of time that is projected to be less than 12
months in duration.
(23)  "Third party" means an agency or a person other than the biological or
adoptive parent or a child who provides care, maintenance, and support to a
child.
(24)  "Tribunal" means the district court, the Department of Human Services,
Office of Recovery Services, or court or administrative agency of any state,
territory, possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Native American Tribe, or other comparable
domestic or foreign jurisdiction.
(25)  "Work-related child care costs" means reasonable child care costs for up
to a full-time work week or training schedule as necessitated by the
employment or training of a parent under Section 78B-12-215.
(26)  "Worksheets" means the forms used to aid in calculating the base child
support award.
